Utah statutes.
75-2-511.   Testamentary additions to trusts.
(1)  A will may validly devise property to the trustee of a trust established
or to be established:
(a)  during the testator's lifetime by the testator, by the testator and some
other person, or by some other person, including a funded or unfunded life
insurance trust, although the settlor has reserved any or all rights of
ownership of the insurance contracts; or
(b)  at the testator's death by the testator's devise to the trustee, if the
trust is identified in the testator's will and its terms are set forth in a
written instrument, other than a will, executed before, concurrently with, or
after the execution of the testator's will or in another individual's will if
that other individual has predeceased the testator, regardless of the
existence, size, or character of the corpus of the trust.  The devise is not
invalid because the trust is amendable or revocable, or because the trust was
amended after the execution of the will or the testator's death.
(2)  Unless the testator's will provides otherwise, property devised to a
trust described in Subsection (1) is not held under a testamentary trust of
the testator, but it becomes a part of the trust to which it is devised, and
shall be administered and disposed of in accordance with the provisions of the
governing instrument setting forth the terms of the trust, including any
amendments thereto made before or after the testator's death.
(3)  Unless the testator's will provides otherwise, a revocation or
termination of the trust before the testator's death causes the devise to
lapse.
